
ABSTRACT

The PG Accommodation Finder is a frontend-based web application designed to simplify the process of discovering and managing Paying Guest (PG) accommodations for students and working professionals. The system addresses common challenges such as information scarcity, lack of transparency, and time-consuming manual searches by providing a centralized digital platform.
The application is developed using React 18, React Router DOM, and TailwindCSS, following a component-based architecture. It supports dual user roles—accommodation seekers and PG owners—each with dedicated dashboards and role-specific functionalities. Key features include advanced search and filtering, booking request management, listing administration, and a review and rating system to enhance transparency.
The application adopts a frontend-only architecture, utilizing the browser’s localStorage for client-side data persistence. This approach ensures fast performance, simplicity, and ease of deployment while demonstrating core concepts of modern web application design. The system delivers a responsive, user-friendly solution that improves the efficiency of PG accommodation discovery and management, while providing a strong foundation for future backend integration.
















## TABLE OF CONTENTS

1. Title Page
2. Abstract
3. Table of Contents
4. Introduction
5. Problem Definition
6. Objectives of the Project
7. Scope of the Project
8. Literature Survey / Existing Systems
9. System Requirements
   - A. Software Requirements
   - B. Hardware Requirements
10. System Design
    - Architecture Diagram
    - Use Case Diagram
    - Activity Diagram
    - UI Wireframes
    - Component Hierarchy
11. Database Design
12. Implementation Details
    - Technology Stack
    - Component Architecture
    - State Management
    - Routing Structure
13. Testing
    - Test Cases
    - Manual Testing
    - UI Testing
    - Functional Testing
    - Bug Fixing Log
14. Results                                                                          
    - Working Screenshots
    - Feature Demonstration

1. INTRODUCTION
1.1 Background
Urbanization has become a defining characteristic of modern societal development. Rapid expansion of cities, growth of educational institutions, and the concentration of employment opportunities in metropolitan regions have led to a continuous influx of students and working professionals into urban areas. As a result, securing suitable accommodation has emerged as one of the most pressing challenges faced by individuals relocating for education or employment purposes.
Students pursuing higher education often migrate from rural or semi-urban regions to cities that host universities, colleges, and professional institutions. Similarly, working professionals relocate frequently due to job opportunities, transfers, or career advancement. In both cases, the need for affordable, flexible, and convenient housing becomes a primary concern. Paying Guest (PG) accommodations have gained popularity as a preferred housing option because they offer furnished living spaces, flexible rental terms, and essential amenities such as food, electricity, water, and housekeeping at comparatively lower costs.
Despite their widespread use, the process of finding PG accommodations remains largely unorganized. Traditional approaches such as relying on word-of-mouth references, scanning newspaper advertisements, consulting brokers, or physically visiting neighborhoods are still prevalent. These methods are inefficient, time-consuming, and often unreliable. Individuals may need to visit multiple locations to compare facilities, pricing, and availability, which is particularly challenging for those with limited time or unfamiliarity with the city.
Furthermore, the lack of standardized information creates confusion and uncertainty. Details regarding amenities, rental conditions, safety measures, and authenticity of listings are often unclear or misleading. In many cases, users are forced to make decisions based on incomplete or outdated information, resulting in dissatisfaction and frequent relocation. These challenges highlight the urgent need for a centralized and transparent solution to streamline the PG accommodation search process.
The advancement of digital technologies has demonstrated the ability of web-based systems to transform traditional services. Industries such as e-commerce, transportation, healthcare, and food delivery have successfully leveraged web applications to enhance accessibility, efficiency, and user experience. Applying similar digital principles to the accommodation search domain can significantly reduce the difficulties associated with traditional methods. A dedicated PG accommodation finder platform can serve as a single point of access where users can explore multiple options, compare facilities, and communicate with property owners effectively.


1.2 Importance of the System
The PG Accommodation Finder system plays a vital role in addressing the challenges faced by both accommodation seekers and PG owners. By digitalizing the search and management process, the system introduces efficiency, transparency, and convenience into an otherwise fragmented ecosystem.
Importance for Students and Working Professionals
For students and professionals, time is a critical resource. Academic schedules, job responsibilities, and relocation constraints limit the ability to physically search for accommodations. A centralized digital platform allows users to browse multiple PG listings from a single interface without the need for repeated site visits. This significantly reduces the time and effort required to shortlist suitable accommodations.
Advanced search and filtering mechanisms enable users to refine results based on budget, location, gender preference, and amenities such as Wi-Fi, food, parking, and power backup. Access to detailed property descriptions, images, and user reviews helps individuals make informed decisions before initiating contact or submitting booking requests. The booking request and tracking functionality further enhances convenience by allowing users to monitor the status of their applications.
Importance for PG Owners and Property Managers
PG owners often struggle with reaching the right audience and managing inquiries efficiently. Traditional advertising methods have limited reach and require continuous effort. The PG Accommodation Finder system provides owners with a digital platform to showcase their properties to a larger and more relevant audience.
The system enables owners to add, update, and manage listings in real time. Booking requests can be reviewed, approved, or rejected through a dedicated dashboard, reducing manual coordination. This structured approach improves operational efficiency and minimizes communication gaps between owners and tenants. Additionally, professionally presented listings with reviews and ratings enhance credibility and attract quality tenants.
Importance for the Accommodation Ecosystem
At a broader level, the system contributes to reducing information asymmetry within the rental market. Transparent reviews and standardized listing formats promote accountability and trust. By minimizing vacant periods for property owners and reducing search costs for tenants, the platform supports a more efficient and balanced accommodation ecosystem.

1.3 Why the Project is Needed
The necessity of the PG Accommodation Finder project is justified by multiple real-world factors that directly impact students, professionals, and property owners.
Growing Demand for Affordable Housing
Urban centers continue to attract a large population of students and professionals every year. The increasing demand for affordable housing options places pressure on existing accommodation systems. PG accommodations serve as a practical solution, but the lack of organized search platforms limits accessibility.
Existence of a Market Gap
While several online platforms focus on apartments, long-term rentals, and hotels, very few cater specifically to PG accommodations. Existing platforms often lack PG-specific filters such as food availability, gender restrictions, and short-term stay options. This gap creates a need for a specialized system designed exclusively for PG accommodation requirements.
Technological Readiness
Modern frontend technologies such as React, client-side routing, and state management tools enable the development of scalable and user-friendly applications. Leveraging these technologies allows the creation of a responsive and interactive platform that significantly improves the accommodation search experience.
Improved Accessibility and Reach
A web-based system can be accessed from any device with an internet connection, including smartphones, tablets, and laptops. This ensures that users can search for accommodations even before relocating, thereby reducing uncertainty and stress associated with last-minute housing arrangements.
Operational Efficiency
Digital platforms automate tasks such as searching, filtering, and booking management. This automation minimizes manual effort, reduces errors, and ensures faster decision-making. As a result, both tenants and owners benefit from improved efficiency and reduced operational overhead.



1.4 Target Users
The PG Accommodation Finder system is designed to serve multiple user groups, each with distinct needs and objectives.
Primary Users
Students
Students form a major segment of PG accommodation seekers. They typically require budget-friendly housing near educational institutions with essential amenities such as Wi-Fi, food services, and safe living environments. The system enables students to compare options efficiently and choose accommodations that align with their academic schedules and financial constraints.
Working Professionals
Working professionals seek convenient and flexible housing options that support their work-life balance. Factors such as location, connectivity, cleanliness, and amenities play a significant role in their decision-making process. The platform allows professionals to filter and shortlist PG accommodations that meet their lifestyle and professional requirements.
Secondary Users
PG Owners and Property Managers
PG owners and managers use the system to list properties, manage availability, and respond to booking requests. The owner dashboard provides tools to monitor listings and bookings efficiently, enabling better property management and increased occupancy rates.














2. PROBLEM DEFINITION
The process of identifying and securing suitable Paying Guest (PG) accommodation for students and working professionals continues to be a complex and inefficient task. Despite the widespread availability of internet services and digital platforms, the PG accommodation sector remains largely fragmented and underdeveloped from a technological perspective. The absence of a specialized, centralized system has resulted in numerous operational, informational, and communication-related challenges for both accommodation seekers and property owners.
This chapter presents a detailed examination of the problems associated with the existing accommodation search process. It highlights the current issues, explains the resulting pain points, and establishes the necessity of addressing these challenges through a structured digital solution.



2.1 Current Issues
The existing PG accommodation search ecosystem is affected by multiple interrelated issues. These issues arise due to dependence on traditional methods, lack of technological integration, and absence of standardized information management practices.

2.1.1 Information Scarcity and Data Fragmentation
One of the most critical issues in the PG accommodation search process is the scarcity of reliable and comprehensive information. Data related to PG accommodations is fragmented across multiple informal and formal sources, including newspaper advertisements, online classifieds, broker listings, social media posts, and personal referrals. Each of these sources provides partial information, often without verification.
In many cases, details regarding room size, number of occupants, amenities, pricing structure, security arrangements, and house rules are either missing or vaguely described. This lack of clarity prevents users from making objective comparisons between different PG options. Furthermore, information provided through offline sources is rarely updated in real time, leading to situations where users inquire about accommodations that are no longer available.
The absence of a standardized format for presenting PG details further aggravates the problem. Without uniform data representation, users are forced to manually interpret and compare information, increasing the likelihood of misunderstanding and incorrect assumptions.

2.1.2 Time-Consuming and Labor-Intensive Search Process
Traditional PG accommodation search methods demand significant physical effort and time investment. Students and professionals are often required to personally visit multiple PG locations to evaluate suitability. This process involves travel expenses, scheduling difficulties, and repeated interactions with property owners or brokers.
For individuals relocating from distant locations, the problem is more severe. They must often depend on short-term accommodation while searching for permanent PG options, which increases financial burden. Additionally, balancing academic responsibilities or professional commitments with extensive accommodation searches results in reduced productivity and increased stress.
The lack of a centralized digital system forces users to consult multiple platforms simultaneously. Managing information collected from various sources is inefficient and error-prone, contributing to further delays in decision-making.


2.1.3 Lack of Transparency and Trust Deficit
Transparency is a fundamental requirement in accommodation selection, yet it is largely absent in the existing system. Users rarely receive accurate information about property conditions, hygiene standards, food quality, safety measures, or neighborhood environment before moving in.
Hidden costs such as maintenance charges, security deposits, or additional utility fees are often disclosed only after finalizing agreements. This lack of transparency leads to mistrust between tenants and PG owners. In the absence of a formal review and rating mechanism, new users have no reliable means of validating claims made by property owners.
This trust deficit results in dissatisfaction, disputes, and frequent relocation, negatively affecting both tenants and owners.

2.1.4 Inefficient Communication and Coordination
Communication between accommodation seekers and PG owners is highly unstructured. Users must individually contact multiple owners through phone calls or messaging platforms to inquire about availability, pricing, and facilities. Tracking responses and maintaining follow-ups becomes difficult, especially when dealing with multiple listings.
There is no standardized process for submitting booking requests or receiving confirmations. Verbal agreements are common, increasing the risk of miscommunication, double bookings, or last-minute cancellations. The absence of documented booking workflows reduces accountability and reliability within the system.

2.1.5 Inadequate Search and Filtering Capabilities
Another significant limitation of existing PG search methods is the lack of advanced filtering options. Users are unable to filter listings based on critical criteria such as budget range, gender restrictions, food availability, or essential amenities. This limitation forces users to manually browse through irrelevant options, significantly increasing search time.
Additionally, most platforms do not allow users to save preferences or apply multiple filters simultaneously. The lack of personalization reduces user satisfaction and limits the effectiveness of the search process.

2.1.6 Challenges Faced by PG Owners
PG owners and property managers also face considerable challenges within the existing ecosystem. Traditional advertising methods offer limited reach and require continuous manual effort. Owners must personally handle inquiries, manage availability, and coordinate bookings without the support of automated tools.
Updating property details such as pricing, availability, or amenities is cumbersome and time-consuming. The lack of professional presentation tools reduces visibility and credibility, resulting in prolonged vacancy periods. These challenges highlight the need for a structured digital platform that supports efficient property management.

2.2 Pain Points
The challenges discussed in the previous section collectively give rise to several critical pain points that affect all stakeholders involved in the PG accommodation process. These pain points are not isolated issues but interconnected consequences of an unorganized and inefficient accommodation search ecosystem. They impact students, working professionals, and property owners at psychological, financial, operational, and social levels.
2.2.1 Psychological Stress and User Frustration
The prolonged and uncertain nature of the PG accommodation search process causes significant psychological stress for students and working professionals. Individuals relocating to a new city are often under strict academic schedules or professional deadlines, leaving them with limited time to secure suitable housing. The uncertainty associated with availability, pricing, and authenticity of listings increases anxiety and mental pressure.
Repeated unsuccessful inquiries, delayed responses from property owners, and frequent rejections further intensify frustration. In many cases, users are forced to compromise on essential requirements due to time constraints, which negatively affects their overall living experience. For students, this stress can directly impact academic performance, while professionals may experience reduced workplace productivity during relocation periods.
2.2.2 Financial Burden and Economic Loss
Extended accommodation search periods often lead to significant financial strain. Individuals who are unable to secure PG accommodation immediately are forced to rely on temporary housing options such as hotels, hostels, or short-term rentals. These alternatives are considerably more expensive and are not sustainable for long durations, especially for students and early-career professionals with limited financial resources.
Additionally, poor accommodation decisions made due to lack of information may result in frequent relocation. Such relocations involve additional costs related to transportation, security deposits, advance rent payments, and moving expenses. Over time, these repeated financial losses accumulate, placing a substantial economic burden on accommodation seekers.
2.2.3 Compromised Decision-Making Quality
Limited access to accurate, verified, and comprehensive information significantly compromises the quality of decision-making during the accommodation selection process. Users are often forced to rely on partial descriptions, verbal assurances, or outdated advertisements when evaluating PG options. This lack of reliable data prevents objective comparison between different accommodations.
As a result, users may choose PG accommodations that fail to meet expectations in terms of cleanliness, safety, food quality, or amenities. Such mismatches between expectations and reality lead to dissatisfaction and instability. Frequent relocation caused by poor initial decisions disrupts daily routines, academic focus, and professional commitments, further aggravating the problem.
2.2.4 Safety and Security Risks
Safety and security are primary concerns for individuals relocating to unfamiliar cities, particularly for students and female professionals. The absence of verified listings, tenant reviews, and standardized safety information increases vulnerability. Users often lack critical details regarding security arrangements, neighborhood safety, entry restrictions, and emergency support systems before moving in.
This lack of transparency exposes accommodation seekers to unsafe living conditions and potential exploitation. Inadequate information regarding security measures such as surveillance, access control, and property management further intensifies risk. These concerns highlight the importance of verified information and trust-building mechanisms within the accommodation ecosystem.
2.2.5 Revenue Loss for Property Owners
The inefficiencies of the existing system also adversely affect PG owners and property managers. Traditional marketing methods such as posters, local advertisements, and broker networks provide limited reach and inconsistent results. Ineffective communication channels lead to missed inquiries and delayed responses, causing potential tenants to seek alternatives.
As a result, vacant rooms often remain unoccupied for extended periods, directly impacting revenue. Additionally, owners lack access to data-driven insights regarding tenant preferences and market demand. Without such insights, it becomes difficult to improve services, adjust pricing strategies, or enhance amenities to attract tenants effectively.
2.2.6 Ecosystem-Level Inefficiency
The cumulative impact of the above pain points results in inefficiency across the entire PG accommodation ecosystem. Redundant efforts by accommodation seekers, inefficient inquiry handling by owners, and lack of coordination between stakeholders lead to wasted time, financial loss, and reduced satisfaction.
The absence of a centralized, structured system prevents effective utilization of available accommodation resources. This systemic inefficiency highlights the urgent need for a technology-driven solution that integrates information management, communication, and decision-making into a unified platform.

2.3 Purpose of Solving the Problem
Addressing the identified challenges serves multiple functional, economic, and social objectives. A structured solution not only improves individual user experiences but also contributes to the overall efficiency and sustainability of the PG accommodation ecosystem.
2.3.1 Enhancement of User Experience
One of the primary objectives of solving these problems is to significantly enhance user experience. A centralized digital platform simplifies the accommodation search process by providing structured information, intuitive navigation, and efficient workflows. Users can browse listings, apply filters, and evaluate options without the need for extensive physical visits.
By reducing uncertainty and manual effort, the system minimizes stress and improves overall satisfaction. A streamlined search and booking process enables users to focus on their academic or professional responsibilities rather than prolonged accommodation searches.
2.3.2 Establishment of Transparency and Accountability
Introducing standardized listing formats and review systems promotes transparency and accountability within the accommodation ecosystem. Verified information regarding pricing, amenities, and availability allows users to make informed decisions with confidence.
User-generated reviews and ratings provide valuable insights into real living experiences, encouraging PG owners to maintain quality standards. This transparency builds trust between tenants and owners, reducing disputes and dissatisfaction.
2.3.3 Improvement in Operational Efficiency
Automation of key processes such as searching, filtering, and booking management significantly improves operational efficiency. Structured workflows reduce manual coordination, minimize errors, and ensure timely communication between stakeholders.
Efficient handling of inquiries and booking requests benefits both accommodation seekers and property owners. Owners can manage listings and availability more effectively, while users receive faster responses and clearer confirmations.
2.3.4 Contribution to Digital Transformation
The project supports the digital transformation of the PG accommodation sector by demonstrating the effective application of modern web technologies. By replacing fragmented and manual processes with a digital platform, the system illustrates how technology can improve service delivery and accessibility.
This transformation aligns with broader trends toward digitalization in urban services and housing management, creating opportunities for scalability and future integration with backend systems.
2.3.5 Economic and Social Benefits
Efficient accommodation discovery reduces financial strain on students and professionals by minimizing temporary housing expenses and relocation costs. For PG owners, improved visibility and reduced vacancy periods contribute to better revenue optimization.
From a social perspective, improved access to safe and affordable accommodation supports educational continuity and professional mobility. By facilitating better housing solutions, the system contributes to sustainable urban development and improved quality of life for urban residents.
.
3. OBJECTIVES OF THE PROJECT
The objectives of the PG Accommodation Finder project define the direction, scope, and intended outcomes of the system. These objectives focus on addressing the challenges identified in the problem definition by applying modern web technologies and user-centric design principles. The objectives are categorized into primary and secondary objectives to clearly distinguish core functional goals from supporting technical and quality-oriented goals.

3.1 Primary Objectives
3.1.1 Design of an Intuitive and Responsive Frontend User Interface
One of the primary objectives of the project is to design an intuitive and responsive frontend user interface that ensures ease of use for all categories of users. Since students, working professionals, and PG owners may possess varying levels of technical expertise, the interface must be simple, visually appealing, and easy to navigate.
The project aims to implement a consistent design language across all pages of the application, ensuring uniform color schemes, typography, layout structures, and interaction patterns. Responsive design principles are applied to ensure seamless usability across different devices such as desktops, laptops, tablets, and smartphones. By adopting a mobile-first approach, the system ensures accessibility for users who primarily rely on mobile devices.
Clear navigation structures and logical information flow reduce the learning curve for first-time users. This objective directly contributes to improving usability and overall user satisfaction.

3.1.2 Enhancement of User Experience Using Modern UI Components
Improving user experience is a core objective of the project. The system aims to utilize modern UI components that provide immediate visual feedback for user actions. Interactive elements such as buttons, forms, alerts, and modals are designed to guide users effectively throughout the application.
Smooth transitions and subtle animations are incorporated to enhance perceived performance and create a more engaging experience. Well-designed forms with proper validation and meaningful error messages reduce user mistakes and improve data accuracy. Accessibility considerations such as readable fonts, appropriate contrast, and intuitive input controls are also emphasized.
The use of reusable UI components ensures consistency throughout the application and reduces development effort, contributing to maintainability and scalability.

3.1.3 Implementation of Advanced Search and Filtering Capabilities
Another critical objective of the project is to implement advanced search and filtering mechanisms that simplify the process of finding suitable PG accommodations. The system is designed to allow users to search for accommodations using keywords such as location or property name.
Multiple filter options are implemented to refine search results based on criteria such as budget range, gender preference, and availability of amenities. These filters are designed to work in combination, enabling users to narrow down results efficiently. Dynamic updates ensure that search results are refreshed instantly as filters are applied or modified.
Sorting features based on price and rating further assist users in prioritizing accommodations that best meet their preferences. This objective directly addresses the inefficiencies of traditional search methods.

3.1.4 Development of a Dual-User Architecture with Role-Based Access
The project aims to implement a dual-user architecture that supports two distinct user roles: accommodation seekers and PG owners. Each role is provided with role-specific functionalities and access permissions to ensure security and clarity.
Separate authentication workflows are designed for students/professionals and PG owners. Role-based routing ensures that users can access only those pages and features relevant to their role. Dedicated dashboards are developed for each user type, providing tailored interfaces for browsing, booking, or managing listings.
This objective ensures proper access control, prevents misuse of features, and enhances the overall system structure.

3.1.5 Facilitation of Efficient Booking Management
Efficient booking management is a key functional objective of the project. The system aims to simplify the process of submitting, tracking, and managing booking requests. Accommodation seekers can submit booking requests through structured forms that capture essential information such as move-in date and contact details.
PG owners are provided with interfaces to review booking requests and take appropriate actions such as approval or rejection. Booking status updates are clearly displayed to users, ensuring transparency throughout the process. Confirmation mechanisms provide clarity regarding next steps after booking approval.
This objective introduces structure and reliability into the booking workflow, replacing informal and error-prone communication methods.

3.1.6 Implementation of Comprehensive State Management
Managing application state efficiently is a fundamental objective of the project. The system utilizes the React Context API to maintain global state across multiple components. This includes state related to user authentication, PG listings, booking requests, filters, and reviews.
State persistence is achieved using browser localStorage to ensure that user sessions and preferences are retained across page reloads. Efficient state update mechanisms are implemented to minimize unnecessary re-renders and maintain smooth application performance.
This objective demonstrates the practical application of modern state management techniques in frontend development.

3.1.7 Development of a Review and Rating System
The project aims to develop a review and rating system to promote transparency and informed decision-making. Accommodation seekers are allowed to submit reviews and ratings based on their experiences.
Average ratings are calculated and displayed on listing pages to provide quick insights into accommodation quality. Access to previous reviews helps users evaluate properties more effectively. Reviews are stored persistently to ensure long-term availability.
This objective encourages accountability among PG owners and builds trust within the platform.

3.1.8 Ensuring Data Persistence Through Local Storage Management
Since the project follows a frontend-only architecture, data persistence is achieved using browser localStorage. The objective is to manage user sessions, authentication states, booking details, and reviews effectively within the client environment.
Efficient data storage and retrieval mechanisms are implemented to ensure consistency and reliability. Although localStorage is not intended for production-level security, its use demonstrates client-side persistence concepts and supports rapid prototyping.
This objective ensures continuity of user experience without backend dependency.


3.2 Secondary Objectives
3.2.1 Adherence to Modern Web Development Best Practices
A key secondary objective of the project is to follow modern web development best practices. The system adopts a component-based architecture that promotes modularity, reusability, and maintainability.
React best practices such as functional components, hooks, and proper lifecycle handling are followed throughout the project. Code readability and documentation are emphasized to facilitate future enhancements and collaboration.

3.2.2 Optimization of Application Performance
The project aims to optimize application performance by reducing load times and ensuring smooth user interactions. Techniques such as code splitting and lazy loading are applied where appropriate to minimize initial load overhead.
Image optimization and efficient resource handling contribute to faster rendering. Proper state management techniques help avoid unnecessary re-renders, improving responsiveness and performance across devices.

3.2.3 Development of Comprehensive Documentation
Another important secondary objective is to develop comprehensive project documentation. The documentation describes system architecture, component structure, and functional workflows in detail.
User guides are prepared for different user roles to facilitate ease of use. Setup and installation instructions support deployment and testing. Developer-oriented documentation ensures ease of maintenance and future scalability.

Outcome of the Objectives
Collectively, these objectives guide the design and development of the PG Accommodation Finder system. By addressing usability, functionality, performance, and maintainability, the project aims to deliver a robust and scalable solution that effectively addresses real-world accommodation challenges.




4. SCOPE OF THE PROJECT
The scope of the PG Accommodation Finder project defines the functional boundaries, system capabilities, and limitations of the application. It clearly outlines what the system is designed to accomplish and what aspects are intentionally excluded from the current implementation. Establishing a well-defined scope ensures clarity in development objectives, prevents feature creep, and aligns the project outcomes with academic and practical constraints.
The scope of this project is categorized into included features, excluded features, and supported user roles. This structured approach ensures transparency regarding system functionality and provides a clear roadmap for future enhancements.

4.1 Features Included
4.1.1 User Authentication and Authorization
The project includes a comprehensive user authentication and authorization mechanism that supports role-based access control. Separate registration and login workflows are provided for students or working professionals and PG owners. This distinction ensures that users can access only the features relevant to their role.
Session management is implemented using browser localStorage to maintain user login state across page reloads. Protected routing mechanisms prevent unauthorized access to restricted pages such as the owner dashboard and user profile sections. Users are provided with editable profile pages where personal information can be viewed and updated, enhancing personalization and usability.
This feature ensures secure access control and structured navigation within the application.

4.1.2 PG Listing Management
A core feature of the project is the ability to browse and manage PG accommodation listings. The system allows users to view all available PG accommodations through a centralized listing interface. Each listing presents essential information such as pricing, amenities, location, and availability.
Advanced search functionality enables users to locate PG accommodations based on keywords such as property name, area, or city. Multiple filtering options allow users to refine search results based on budget range, gender preference, and available amenities such as Wi-Fi, food, parking, security, and power backup. These filters can be applied simultaneously, enabling precise and efficient searches.
Sorting options based on price and ratings help users prioritize listings according to affordability or quality. A dynamic result count display provides immediate feedback on the number of matching accommodations, improving transparency and usability.

4.1.3 PG Details and Information Display
The project includes detailed property information pages for each PG accommodation. These pages provide comprehensive insights into the property, including image galleries, location details, pricing structure, available rooms, and gender specifications.
Complete lists of amenities and detailed descriptions help users understand the facilities offered. Owner contact information is displayed to facilitate direct communication when required. A verification status indicator enhances trust by highlighting authenticity and reliability.
This feature addresses the information gaps commonly found in traditional accommodation search methods and supports informed decision-making.

4.1.4 Owner Dashboard and Property Management
The system provides a dedicated dashboard for PG owners to manage their properties efficiently. The dashboard includes an overview section displaying key statistics such as total listings, pending booking requests, approved bookings, and rejected bookings.
Owners can add new PG listings by entering property details through structured forms. Existing listings can be edited or deleted as needed, allowing real-time updates to pricing, amenities, and availability. Property status indicators enable owners to mark listings as vacant or occupied, ensuring accurate availability information.
Available room management features allow owners to track and update room counts dynamically. This centralized management interface reduces administrative effort and improves operational efficiency.

4.1.5 Booking System and Request Management
The booking system is an integral part of the project scope. Users can submit booking requests directly from PG detail pages using structured booking forms. These forms collect essential information such as user contact details, preferred move-in date, and optional messages to the property owner.
After submission, users are redirected to a booking confirmation page that displays request details clearly. Booking status tracking allows users to monitor the progress of their requests, categorized as pending, approved, or rejected.
PG owners can view all booking requests associated with their listings through the dashboard. They can review applicant details and take appropriate actions such as approval or rejection. This structured workflow replaces informal communication methods and enhances reliability.

4.1.6 Review and Rating System
To promote transparency and accountability, the project includes a review and rating system. Authenticated users can submit reviews and star ratings based on their accommodation experience.
Average ratings are calculated and displayed prominently on listing pages, providing quick quality indicators. Users can view all reviews associated with a property, enabling better evaluation and comparison. Reviews and ratings are stored persistently using localStorage to ensure data continuity.
This feature builds trust within the platform and encourages PG owners to maintain service quality.

4.1.7 User Profile Management
The system includes a comprehensive profile management feature for students and professionals. Users can view and update personal information such as name, email, phone number, and user type.
The profile section also displays booking history with detailed status information. Users can navigate from booking records to corresponding PG detail pages and view booking confirmations. This centralized profile management improves user engagement and convenience.

4.1.8 Responsive Design and Cross-Device Compatibility
The project follows a mobile-first responsive design approach to ensure usability across various devices and screen sizes. Layouts adapt dynamically to desktops, tablets, and smartphones without compromising functionality.
Mobile navigation menus, touch-friendly elements, and optimized layouts enhance accessibility for users relying on mobile devices. This feature ensures consistent user experience regardless of device type.

4.1.9 Modern UI and User Experience Design
The application incorporates modern UI and UX design principles to enhance visual appeal and usability. A gradient-based design theme, consistent typography, and cohesive color schemes contribute to a professional appearance.
Smooth transitions, hover effects, and icon-based navigation improve interactivity and user engagement. Accessibility considerations such as readable fonts and intuitive layouts ensure inclusivity and ease of use.
4.2 Features Excluded (Out of Scope)
While the PG Accommodation Finder project provides a comprehensive set of frontend functionalities, certain features are intentionally excluded from the current scope. These exclusions are made to maintain focus on core objectives, limit system complexity, and align the project with academic constraints. Clearly defining out-of-scope features ensures realistic implementation goals and provides a roadmap for future enhancements.
4.2.1 Backend Integration and Server-Side Processing
Backend integration is explicitly excluded from the scope of this project. The system does not include server-side APIs, database connectivity, or backend authentication mechanisms. All application logic, data handling, and state management are implemented on the client side using modern frontend technologies.
This decision allows the project to concentrate on frontend architecture, user interface design, and client-side state management. Backend integration would require additional infrastructure such as servers, databases, and authentication services, which are beyond the intended academic focus of the project. However, the frontend architecture is designed in a modular manner that can support future backend integration without major restructuring.
4.2.2 Database Connectivity and Persistent Server Storage
The project does not utilize relational or non-relational databases such as MySQL, PostgreSQL, or MongoDB. Instead, browser localStorage is used solely for client-side data persistence. As a result, features such as data normalization, transaction management, and concurrency control are not implemented.
This limitation means that data stored within the application is device-specific and not synchronized across multiple users or sessions. While this approach is sufficient for demonstration and prototyping purposes, it is not suitable for large-scale production deployment. The exclusion of database connectivity helps keep the system lightweight and avoids complexities related to data security and server maintenance.
4.2.3 Payment Gateway and Online Transaction Processing
Online payment functionality is excluded from the project scope. The system does not support payment gateways, digital transactions, subscription models, or refund processing. Booking interactions are limited to request submission and status tracking.
Payment integration introduces challenges related to security, regulatory compliance, encryption, and financial data handling. Including such features would significantly increase project complexity and require backend support. Therefore, payment processing is intentionally omitted and identified as a potential future enhancement.
4.2.4 Email, SMS, and Push Notification Services
The application does not include automated notification services such as email alerts, SMS messages, or push notifications. Users are required to manually check booking statuses and updates within the application interface.
Notification services require third-party integrations and backend support to function reliably. Excluding these services helps maintain the frontend-only nature of the project while keeping the implementation straightforward. Despite this limitation, the system design allows notification features to be incorporated in future versions.
4.2.5 Real-Time Communication Features
Real-time communication features such as live chat between tenants and PG owners are not included in the project. The system does not support instant messaging, chat history, or real-time presence indicators.
Implementing real-time communication requires technologies such as WebSockets or real-time backend services, which are outside the scope of this academic project. Instead, communication is simplified through structured booking requests and owner contact details.
4.2.6 Map-Based Location Visualization and GPS Features
The project does not include map-based location visualization using services such as Google Maps or OpenStreetMap. GPS-based location detection, distance calculation, and route planning functionalities are also excluded.
These features require external APIs and increase dependency on third-party services. Their exclusion helps reduce implementation complexity and ensures that the project remains focused on core accommodation discovery features rather than geospatial analysis.
4.2.7 Advanced Analytics and Reporting Tools
Advanced analytics features such as user behavior tracking, booking trend analysis, revenue reports, and performance dashboards are excluded from the current scope. The owner dashboard provides only basic statistical summaries related to listings and booking statuses.
Implementing advanced analytics would require large-scale data collection, processing, and visualization capabilities supported by backend infrastructure. These features are considered beyond the scope of a frontend-only academic project.
4.2.8 Multi-Language and Localization Support
The system does not support multi-language interfaces or localization features. All content is presented in a single language, limiting accessibility for users who prefer regional or international languages.
Localization requires additional design considerations, translation resources, and dynamic content handling. These aspects are excluded to maintain simplicity and focus on functional correctness.
4.2.9 Advanced Search Personalization Features
Personalization features such as saved or favorite listings, comparison tools, recommendation engines, and user preference learning are not implemented. Users must manually search and filter listings during each session.
These features typically rely on user behavior analysis and historical data, which are difficult to implement effectively without backend support. Their exclusion helps prevent scope creep and ensures timely project completion.
4.2.10 Social Media Integration and Content Sharing
The application does not include social media integration features such as sharing listings on external platforms, social login, or content embedding. These features require API integrations and additional security considerations.
By excluding social media integration, the project avoids unnecessary dependencies and focuses on core accommodation search functionality.
4.2.11 Advanced Owner Management Features
Advanced owner-side features such as bulk listing uploads, tenant lifecycle management, financial accounting, and revenue forecasting are excluded. The owner dashboard is limited to basic listing and booking management.
These advanced features are typically part of enterprise-level property management systems and require extensive backend processing and data analysi





5. LITERATURE SURVEY
The literature survey examines existing accommodation search platforms to understand current system capabilities, limitations, and design approaches. Studying existing systems helps identify gaps in functionality, usability issues, and opportunities for improvement. This chapter analyzes prominent platforms relevant to accommodation discovery and derives insights that influenced the design and development of the PG Accommodation Finder system.

5.1 Study of Similar Applications
To evaluate the existing landscape, major accommodation-related platforms were studied with respect to functionality, usability, business model, and suitability for students and working professionals seeking PG accommodations.

5.1.1 Analysis of NoBroker.com
NoBroker.com is a well-established digital platform designed to eliminate brokerage fees in the rental and property search domain. It offers a wide range of property listings, including apartments, PG accommodations, and commercial spaces, targeting a broad audience.
Functional Capabilities of NoBroker.com
The platform provides advanced search features that allow users to filter properties based on location, budget, property type, and furnishing status. Map-based visualization enables users to identify properties geographically. Direct communication between property owners and tenants reduces dependency on brokers. Verified owner profiles and listings enhance trust and authenticity. Additionally, mobile applications support accessibility across Android and iOS devices.
Strengths of NoBroker.com
One of the major strengths of NoBroker.com is its extensive inventory of properties across multiple cities. The platform benefits from strong brand recognition and widespread adoption. The integrated map view improves location awareness, while multi-property support allows users to explore diverse accommodation options on a single platform.
Limitations of NoBroker.com
Despite its popularity, NoBroker.com is not optimized specifically for PG accommodations. The interface is feature-rich but complex, which can overwhelm users who are only interested in PG housing. Filters tailored to PG-specific needs such as food availability, gender restrictions, and short-term stays are limited. Premium features often require paid subscriptions, which may not be affordable for students. The platform primarily focuses on long-term rentals, reducing its suitability for temporary or flexible PG accommodation seekers.
Relevance to the Proposed Project
The PG Accommodation Finder project differs by narrowing its scope to PG accommodations only. By eliminating unnecessary features and focusing on student and professional needs, the proposed system offers a simplified and more relevant user experience. The absence of subscription fees and the inclusion of PG-specific filters directly address the limitations observed in NoBroker.com.

5.1.2 Analysis of Nestaway.com
Nestaway.com is a managed accommodation platform that provides fully furnished rental properties with flexible lease options. The platform targets professionals and families seeking hassle-free living arrangements.
Functional Capabilities of Nestaway.com
Nestaway offers end-to-end accommodation services, including property listing, online booking, payment processing, and maintenance support. Properties are fully managed, ensuring standardized quality and consistent service delivery. Mobile applications enable easy access and booking management.
Strengths of Nestaway.com
The managed service model of Nestaway provides a high level of convenience. Tenants benefit from professional maintenance, standardized property quality, and structured lease agreements. The integrated payment system simplifies rent transactions and enhances reliability.
Limitations of Nestaway.com
Nestaway is primarily focused on long-term rentals rather than PG accommodations. Pricing is significantly higher due to management fees, making it less suitable for students and budget-conscious users. The platform offers limited PG options and requires substantial backend infrastructure, increasing operational complexity. Its services are not ideal for users seeking short-term or low-cost PG housing.
Relevance to the Proposed Project
Unlike Nestaway, the PG Accommodation Finder project emphasizes affordability and flexibility. It supports direct owner-tenant interaction without management fees, making it more accessible to students and early-career professionals. The frontend-only architecture reduces system complexity while still delivering essential functionality.

5.1.3 Review-Based Platform Concept Inspired by Zomato
Zomato, though not an accommodation platform, provides valuable insights into user-centric design, particularly in the domains of reviews, ratings, and search usability.
Functional Characteristics of Zomato-Inspired Systems
Zomato employs a mobile-first design with intuitive navigation, filter-based search, and strong emphasis on user-generated reviews and ratings. The aggregator model allows users to compare multiple options easily and make informed decisions.
Strengths of the Zomato Design Approach
The platform excels in UI/UX design, providing seamless navigation and effective filtering. The review-driven model builds trust and transparency, enabling users to evaluate services based on real experiences. Its focus on simplicity and speed significantly enhances user engagement.
Limitations of Applying This Model Directly
Zomato is designed for food discovery and operates under a different business and operational model. Accommodation systems require additional considerations such as booking workflows, user authentication, and property management, which are not directly addressed by food-based platforms.
Learnings Applied to the Proposed Project
The PG Accommodation Finder project adopts the review-centric philosophy and filter-based discovery approach inspired by Zomato. Emphasis on usability, transparency, and user feedback has been incorporated while adapting the model to suit accommodation-specific requirements.

5.2 Comparative Analysis of Existing Systems
A comparative study was conducted to evaluate the suitability of existing platforms for PG accommodation discovery. The comparison focuses on functionality, usability, cost-effectiveness, and architectural design.
NoBroker and Nestaway offer comprehensive rental solutions but lack specialization in PG accommodations. Both platforms involve backend-heavy architectures and additional costs. In contrast, the proposed system focuses exclusively on PG housing, ensuring relevance, simplicity, and affordability.
The PG Accommodation Finder project provides a balanced approach by combining essential features such as search, booking, and reviews without introducing unnecessary complexity or financial barriers.

5.3 Distinctiveness of the Proposed System
The PG Accommodation Finder system introduces several distinguishing characteristics that set it apart from existing platforms.
Specialized Focus on PG Accommodations
Unlike generic rental platforms, the proposed system is designed exclusively for PG accommodations. Filters, data fields, and workflows are tailored to PG-specific requirements such as food availability, gender restrictions, and short-term stays. This specialization ensures higher relevance and improved usability for the target audience.
Student-Centric and Professional-Friendly Design
The system prioritizes simplicity and accessibility. The interface is designed to accommodate users with limited technical expertise. Budget-focused filtering, transparent pricing, and review-based evaluation directly address student needs. Professionals benefit from efficient search workflows and flexible accommodation options.
Lightweight and Scalable Architecture
The frontend-only architecture significantly reduces system complexity and deployment overhead. Faster load times and minimal dependencies enhance performance. The modular design supports future backend integration without major restructuring.
Dual Dashboard and Role-Based Access
The inclusion of separate dashboards for tenants and PG owners ensures clarity and security. Role-based feature access prevents misuse and enhances user experience. Owners benefit from structured property and booking management tools, while users gain access to booking history and profile management.
Modern Technology Stack
The project leverages modern frontend technologies such as React, React Router, and TailwindCSS. Component-based architecture promotes maintainability and scalability. Adoption of current best practices ensures long-term relevance and ease of enhancement.
Cost-Effective and Accessible Solution
The absence of subscription fees and backend infrastructure costs makes the system financially accessible. Free access encourages adoption among students and small PG owners. This cost-effective approach aligns with academic objectives and real-world affordability concerns.




6. SYSTEM REQUIREMENTS
System requirements define the essential software and hardware components necessary for the successful development, deployment, and execution of the PG Accommodation Finder application. This chapter outlines the technical prerequisites that ensure the application operates efficiently, remains scalable, and delivers a consistent user experience across devices and platforms. The requirements are categorized into software and hardware specifications to provide a clear and structured understanding of system dependencies.

6.1 Software Requirements
The PG Accommodation Finder is implemented as a modern frontend-only web application. The software requirements focus on frontend frameworks, development tools, styling technologies, and client-side storage mechanisms that collectively support application functionality, performance, and maintainability.

6.1.1 Frontend Technologies
The core of the system is built using React, a widely adopted JavaScript library for building interactive user interfaces. React version 18.2.0 is utilized to take advantage of its component-based architecture, which enables modular development and code reuse. The use of a virtual DOM significantly improves rendering performance by minimizing direct manipulation of the browser DOM.
React Hooks are employed to manage component state and lifecycle behavior in a clean and declarative manner. JSX syntax allows developers to write UI structures in a readable and maintainable format, improving development efficiency and reducing complexity.
React DOM is used to efficiently render React components into the browser DOM, ensuring smooth UI updates and responsiveness. Client-side navigation is handled using React Router DOM version 6.20.0, which enables seamless page transitions without full page reloads. Features such as dynamic routing, protected routes, and history management support role-based navigation and secure access control throughout the application.

6.1.2 Styling and User Interface Framework
TailwindCSS version 3.3.6 is used as the primary styling framework. TailwindCSS follows a utility-first approach, allowing rapid UI development through predefined CSS classes. This approach improves consistency in design while reducing the need for custom CSS files.
Responsive design utilities ensure that the application adapts smoothly across different screen sizes and devices. Custom color schemes and typography styles contribute to a professional and modern visual appearance. Integration with PostCSS allows for optimized CSS processing and better browser compatibility.

6.1.3 Development Tools and Build System
Vite version 5.0.8 is used as the build tool and development server. Vite provides extremely fast startup times and hot module replacement, which enhances developer productivity by enabling real-time feedback during development. Optimized production builds generated by Vite ensure faster load times and efficient asset bundling.
Additional build dependencies such as PostCSS and Autoprefixer are included to automate CSS processing and ensure cross-browser compatibility. The Vite React plugin enables seamless integration between Vite and React, simplifying configuration and improving build performance.

6.1.4 Markup and Programming Languages
HTML5 is used to structure application content using semantic elements that improve accessibility and search engine readability. Built-in form validation attributes help ensure data correctness and improve user experience.
CSS3 is utilized alongside TailwindCSS to manage layout and visual styling. Techniques such as Flexbox and Grid enable responsive and adaptive layouts. CSS transitions and animations enhance interactivity, while media queries ensure device compatibility.
JavaScript ES6 and above is used for application logic. Modern language features such as arrow functions, destructuring, template literals, async/await, and module imports improve code clarity, maintainability, and execution efficiency.

6.1.5 Data Storage and Client-Side Persistence
The application uses the browser’s Local Storage API for client-side data persistence. Local storage enables the system to store user sessions, authentication states, booking details, reviews, and user preferences without relying on a backend database.
Data is stored in key-value pairs and retrieved during application initialization to restore user state across page reloads. While localStorage is not suitable for large-scale production systems, it effectively supports the project’s frontend-only architecture and academic objectives.
Initial PG listing data is stored in JSON format, which provides a structured and human-readable data representation. JSON files allow easy data manipulation and serve as a temporary data source during development.

6.1.6 API and Backend Service Considerations
Although the current implementation does not include backend services, the system architecture is designed to support future backend integration. The frontend follows RESTful design principles, making it compatible with API-based data exchange.
JSON is considered as the standard data interchange format for future API responses. Local storage is used as a temporary replacement for backend persistence, allowing the system to function independently while maintaining extensibility.

6.1.7 Development Environment and Version Control
Visual Studio Code is recommended as the primary code editor due to its extensive support for JavaScript and React development. Extensions such as ESLint and Prettier help maintain code quality and formatting consistency.
Git is used for version control, enabling systematic tracking of code changes and collaboration. Repositories can be hosted on platforms such as GitHub or GitLab to facilitate backup, collaboration, and future enhancements.
Node Package Manager (npm) version 8.0.0 or higher is required to manage project dependencies. Yarn may be used as an alternative package manager based on developer preference.

6.2 Hardware Requirements
Hardware requirements specify the minimum and recommended system specifications needed for both development and end-user access. These requirements ensure smooth application performance and usability.

6.2.1 Development Machine Requirements
A development system with at least an Intel Core i3 or equivalent AMD processor is required to run modern development tools efficiently. A minimum of 4 GB RAM is sufficient for basic development, though 8 GB RAM is recommended for smoother performance when running build tools and browsers simultaneously.
Adequate disk space is required to store project files, node modules, and build artifacts. A minimum screen resolution of 1366×768 ensures comfortable UI development. A stable internet connection is necessary for dependency installation and development workflows.

6.2.2 End-User Device Requirements
The application is accessible on desktop and laptop computers equipped with modern web browsers. A minimum resolution of 1024×768 ensures proper layout rendering. Internet connectivity is required to access the web application.
Mobile devices such as smartphones are fully supported through responsive design techniques. Devices must support modern browsers and have touch input capability. Tablets running iOS or Android are also supported, providing flexibility for users accessing the system on different platforms.

6.2.3 Browser Compatibility Requirements
The system supports modern web browsers including Google Chrome, Mozilla Firefox, Microsoft Edge, Safari, and Opera. These browsers provide full support for JavaScript ES6+, CSS3, HTML5, and localStorage APIs.
JavaScript must be enabled for the application to function correctly. Internet Explorer is not supported due to its lack of compatibility with modern web standards and JavaScript features.
















7. SYSTEM DESIGN
System design defines the architectural structure, functional behavior, and interaction flow of the PG Accommodation Finder application. This chapter explains how the system components are organized, how users interact with the system, and how data flows between different modules. The design ensures modularity, scalability, maintainability, and ease of future enhancement while strictly adhering to a frontend-only architecture.

7.1 Overall System Architecture
The PG Accommodation Finder is designed using a client-side single-page application (SPA) architecture. In this architecture, all application logic, rendering, routing, and data handling are executed within the user’s web browser. This eliminates dependency on backend servers and simplifies deployment while maintaining responsiveness and usability.
The system supports access from multiple devices such as desktops, tablets, and mobile phones through modern web browsers. The React framework acts as the central processing layer, coordinating user interactions, state updates, and UI rendering.
Architecture Diagram
┌─────────────────────────────────────────────────────────────┐
│                     CLIENT-SIDE APPLICATION                  │
│                                                             │
│  ┌──────────────┐    ┌──────────────┐    ┌──────────────┐ │
│  │   Browser    │    │   Browser    │    │   Browser    │ │
│  │  (Desktop)   │    │  (Mobile)    │    │   (Tablet)   │ │
│  └──────┬───────┘    └──────┬───────┘    └──────┬───────┘ │
│         │                   │                   │         │
│         └───────────────────┼───────────────────┘         │
│                             │                             │
│                    ┌────────▼────────┐                    │
│                    │   React App     │                    │
│                    │   (Vite Build)  │                    │
│                    └────────┬────────┘                    │
│                             │                             │
│      ┌──────────────────────┼──────────────────────┐     │
│      │                      │                      │     │
│ ┌────▼────┐          ┌──────▼──────┐        ┌──────▼────┐│
│ │ Router  │          │ Context API │        │ Components││
│ │(Routes) │          │(State Mgmt) │        │ (UI Layer)││
│ └────┬────┘          └──────┬──────┘        └──────┬────┘│
│      │                      │                      │     │
│      └──────────────────────┼──────────────────────┘     │
│                             │                             │
│                    ┌────────▼────────┐                    │
│                    │  Local Storage  │                    │
│                    │ (Persistence)   │                    │
│                    └─────────────────┘                    │
│                                                             │
│   Static Assets: pgs.json (Initial PG Listing Data)         │
└─────────────────────────────────────────────────────────────┘
This architecture ensures fast page transitions, reduced server dependency, and efficient UI updates.

7.2 Use Case Design
Use case design describes how different users interact with the system and the services provided to them. The PG Accommodation Finder supports three primary actors: Guest Users, Students/Professionals, and PG Owners. Each actor has a distinct set of functionalities based on authorization level.


Use Case Diagram
                    Student / Professional
                             |
        ┌────────────────────┼────────────────────┐
        |                    |                    |
   Register/Login        Browse PGs           View Profile
        |                    |                    |
        |               Search & Filter        View Bookings
        |                    |
        |               View PG Details
        |                    |
        |               Book PG / Add Review

                        PG Owner
                             |
        ┌────────────────────┼────────────────────┐
        |                    |                    |
   Register/Login        Manage Listings       Manage Bookings
                             |
                       Add / Edit / Delete PG
This diagram illustrates role-based access and ensures that functionalities are logically separated to prevent unauthorized access.

7.3 Activity Diagram for Booking Process
The activity diagram explains the step-by-step workflow followed when a user attempts to book a PG accommodation. It highlights decision points, user interactions, and system responses.
Activity Diagram
Start
  |
User visits website
  |
Is user logged in?
  |---- No ----> Redirect to Login
  |                  |
  |             Login/Signup
  |__________________|
  |
Browse PG listings
  |
Apply search and filters
  |
View PG details
  |
Check room availability
  |
Rooms available?
  |---- No ----> Show unavailable message
  |
  |---- Yes ----> Fill booking form
                    |
                Submit request
                    |
            Save booking in localStorage
                    |
           Show booking confirmation
                    |
               Owner reviews request
                    |
              Approved or Rejected
                    |
                  End
This flow ensures structured booking management and clarity in system behavior.

7.4 User Interface Wireframe Design
Wireframes provide a visual representation of the user interface structure without focusing on visual styling. They help in understanding layout hierarchy and navigation flow.
Home Page Wireframe
Navbar (Logo | Home | Browse | Login)
-------------------------------------
Hero Section
"Find Your Perfect PG"
[Browse PGs Button]
-------------------------------------
Why Choose Us?
Verified Listings | Easy Search | Reviews
-------------------------------------
Featured PG Cards
-------------------------------------
Footer
Listings Page Wireframe
Navbar
-------------------------------------
Search Bar
-------------------------------------
Filters Panel | PG Listings Grid
(Budget, Location, Gender, Amenities)
-------------------------------------
PG Details Page Wireframe
Navbar
-------------------------------------
Image Gallery
PG Name | Location | Price | Rating
-------------------------------------
Request Booking Button
-------------------------------------
Amenities | Description
-------------------------------------
Reviews Section
-------------------------------------
Owner Dashboard Wireframe
Navbar
-------------------------------------
Statistics Cards
(Total | Pending | Approved | Rejected)
-------------------------------------
My Listings | Manage Bookings
-------------------------------------
These wireframes guide consistent UI development and user experience.

7.5 Component Hierarchy Design
Component hierarchy defines how the application is broken down into reusable and manageable units. This modular structure improves maintainability and scalability.
Component Hierarchy Diagram
App
 ├── Navbar
 │    ├── Logo
 │    ├── Navigation Links
 │    └── User Menu
 ├── Routes
 │    ├── Home
 │    ├── Listings
 │    ├── PGDetails
 │    ├── Login/Register
 │    ├── Dashboard
 │    └── Profile
 ├── Shared Components
 │    ├── PGCard
 │    ├── FilterPanel
 │    └── BookingForm
 └── Footer
Each component handles a specific responsibility, enabling clean separation of concerns.

7.6 Data Flow Design
Data flow design explains how data moves through the system from user interaction to persistent storage.









Data Flow Diagram
User Action
    |
React Component
    |
Event Handler
    |
Context API (Global State)
    |           |
State Update   Save to localStorage
    |           |
UI Re-render   Data Persistence
This approach ensures synchronized UI updates and data consistency across the application.






























CHAPTER 8.
8. DATABASE DESIGN


Database design defines how data is structured, stored, accessed, and managed within a system. In the PG Accommodation Finder project, the database design deviates from traditional server-based database architectures due to the frontend-only nature of the application. Instead of using a centralized database server, the system adopts a client-side data persistence approach using browser localStorage and static JSON files.
This chapter explains the rationale behind the chosen data storage strategy, the logical data models, data structures used, and the flow of data persistence within the application.

8.1 Data Storage Approach
The PG Accommodation Finder application is designed without backend or server-side components. As a result, all data storage and retrieval operations are performed on the client side. The system uses a hybrid data storage strategy consisting of static JSON files for initial data loading and browser localStorage for runtime persistence.
Static JSON files are used to store predefined PG accommodation listings that are loaded when the application initializes. Browser localStorage is used to persist dynamic data such as user authentication details, booking requests, reviews, and user profiles. This approach ensures that data remains available across page reloads within the same browser environment.
While this method is not suitable for large-scale production systems, it is effective for academic projects, prototypes, and frontend-focused implementations.

8.2 Logical Data Model
The logical data model represents the structure of data entities and their relationships without considering physical storage mechanisms. The primary data entities in the system include Users, PG Listings, Bookings, and Reviews.
Each entity is designed to reflect real-world accommodation processes while maintaining simplicity and clarity.

8.3 Entity Description and Attributes
8.3.1 User Entity
The User entity represents all individuals interacting with the system. Users are classified into students/professionals and PG owners based on their role.
Each user record contains essential attributes such as unique user identifier, name, email address, phone number, role type, and authentication status. For students and professionals, booking history is associated with the user profile. For PG owners, listed properties and received booking requests are linked to the user.
User data is stored securely in localStorage and retrieved upon login to maintain session continuity.

8.3.2 PG Listing Entity
The PG Listing entity represents accommodation properties available for booking. Each listing contains property-specific information such as PG name, location, address, price, available rooms, gender preference, amenities, description, owner details, and verification status.
Listings are initially loaded from a static JSON file and then managed dynamically during runtime. Owners can add, update, or remove listings through the dashboard interface, with changes reflected in localStorage.

8.3.3 Booking Entity
The Booking entity captures all booking requests submitted by users. Each booking record includes a unique booking ID, associated PG ID, user ID, move-in date, booking status, and optional user message.
Booking status values include pending, approved, and rejected. Owners update booking statuses through the dashboard, and corresponding changes are reflected in the user’s booking history.

8.3.4 Review Entity
The Review entity stores user feedback for PG accommodations. Each review includes the reviewer’s user ID, PG ID, star rating, review comment, and submission date.
Reviews are displayed publicly on PG detail pages and contribute to the calculation of average ratings. All review data is stored persistently in localStorage.

8.4 Entity Relationship Overview
The relationships between entities define how different data components interact logically within the system.
A user can submit multiple booking requests, but each booking is associated with only one PG listing. A PG listing can receive multiple booking requests from different users. Similarly, users can submit multiple reviews, and each PG listing can have multiple associated reviews.

8.5 Entity Relationship Diagram (ER Diagram)
The following diagram illustrates the logical relationships between major entities in the system.
User
 ├── userId
 ├── name
 ├── email
 ├── phone
 ├── role
 │
 │ 1
 │
 │
 │ M
Booking
 ├── bookingId
 ├── userId
 ├── pgId
 ├── moveInDate
 ├── status
 │
 │ M
 │
 │ 1
PG Listing
 ├── pgId
 ├── name
 ├── location
 ├── price
 ├── availableRooms
 │
 │ 1
 │
 │ M
Review
 ├── reviewId
 ├── userId
 ├── pgId
 ├── rating
 ├── comment
This ER diagram reflects a simplified but effective data model suitable for frontend-based applications.

8.6 Physical Data Representation
Since no traditional database is used, physical data representation is achieved using JSON objects stored in localStorage.
Sample PG Listing Structure
{
  "pgId": 101,
  "name": "Green View PG",
  "location": "Bangalore",
  "address": "BTM Layout",
  "price": 12000,
  "availableRooms": 3,
  "gender": "Boys",
  "amenities": ["WiFi", "Food", "Laundry"],
  "ownerId": 201,
  "rating": 4.5
}
Sample Booking Structure
{
  "bookingId": "BKG123",
  "userId": 301,
  "pgId": 101,
  "moveInDate": "2024-06-01",
  "status": "Pending",
  "message": "Looking for immediate move-in"
}
Sample Review Structure
{
  "reviewId": "RV501",
  "userId": 301,
  "pgId": 101,
  "rating": 5,
  "comment": "Clean rooms and good food",
  "date": "2024-05-20"
}
These structures ensure consistency and ease of manipulation within JavaScript.

8.7 Data Flow and Persistence Mechanism
When a user performs an action such as registering, booking a PG, or submitting a review, the corresponding data object is created or updated within the application state managed by the Context API. The updated state is then serialized and stored in localStorage.
On application reload, stored data is retrieved from localStorage and rehydrated into the application state, ensuring continuity of user sessions and stored records.

8.8 Data Security and Limitations
Client-side storage offers simplicity but has inherent limitations. Data stored in localStorage is device-specific and lacks encryption by default. The system does not handle concurrent users or cross-device synchronization.
These limitations are acceptable within the academic scope of the project. In future implementations, backend databases and authentication services can replace client-side storage to enhance security and scalability.






9. IMPLEMENTATION DETAILS
This chapter describes the practical implementation of the PG Accommodation Finder application. It explains how the system architecture and design decisions discussed in previous chapters were translated into a working software solution. The chapter focuses on component implementation, routing logic, state management, data persistence, and user interaction handling.
The implementation strictly follows a frontend-only approach using modern web development technologies, ensuring clarity, modularity, and maintainability.

9.1 Project Structure and Organization
The project follows a well-structured and modular folder organization to ensure readability and ease of maintenance. The source code is divided into logical directories based on functionality.
The main project structure includes folders for components, pages, context, assets, and utility files. Shared UI components such as navigation bars, cards, and filters are placed in a common components directory to encourage reuse. Page-level components such as Home, Listings, PG Details, Dashboard, and Profile are separated to maintain clear responsibility boundaries.
This structured organization simplifies debugging, testing, and future enhancements.

9.2 Application Entry Point and Initialization
The application execution begins from the main entry file, where the React application is mounted to the browser DOM. The root component wraps the entire application with routing and global state providers.
The Context API provider initializes global state values such as user authentication status, PG listings, bookings, and reviews. On application startup, data stored in localStorage is retrieved and injected into the state to restore previous user sessions.
This initialization ensures that user data persists across page reloads and browser sessions.

9.3 Routing and Navigation Implementation
Client-side routing is implemented using React Router DOM. Routes are defined for public pages such as Home and Listings, as well as protected pages such as Profile and Owner Dashboard.
Role-based route protection is implemented by checking authentication status and user role before rendering protected components. Unauthorized users attempting to access restricted pages are redirected to the login page.
Dynamic routing is used for PG detail pages, where each listing is accessed using a unique PG identifier in the URL. This approach enables clean URLs and direct access to individual PG information pages.

9.4 State Management Using Context API
Global state management is implemented using the React Context API to avoid prop drilling and ensure consistent data access across components.
A centralized context manages multiple state variables, including user details, authentication status, PG listings, booking records, and reviews. Context functions handle operations such as login, logout, booking submission, booking status updates, and review addition.
State updates trigger automatic UI re-rendering, ensuring that changes are immediately reflected throughout the application.

9.5 Implementation of User Authentication
User authentication is implemented using a simple role-based mechanism suitable for a frontend-only system. During registration, user details such as name, email, phone number, role, and password are captured and stored in localStorage.
During login, entered credentials are validated against stored user records. Upon successful authentication, user session details are stored in localStorage and reflected in the global state.
Logout functionality clears session data from localStorage and resets authentication state, preventing unauthorized access.

9.6 PG Listing Implementation
PG listings are initially loaded from a static JSON file containing predefined accommodation data. This data includes property details such as name, location, price, amenities, and availability.
Owners can add new PG listings through structured forms. Submitted listing data is validated and then appended to the existing listings stored in localStorage. Editing and deletion functionalities allow owners to update listing details dynamically.
Changes made by owners are immediately reflected in the listings page due to centralized state management.

9.7 Search and Filter Functionality
The search functionality allows users to search PG listings by property name or location using a keyword-based approach. Filtering options are implemented using controlled form inputs that update filter state variables.
Filters such as budget range, gender preference, and amenities work in combination to refine displayed results. Sorting options allow users to reorder listings based on price or rating.
The filtered results are computed dynamically within the component render cycle, ensuring fast response without additional data fetching.

9.8 Booking System Implementation
The booking system enables authenticated users to submit booking requests from PG detail pages. Booking forms capture user details, preferred move-in date, and optional messages.
Upon submission, a booking object is created with a unique booking identifier and stored in localStorage. The booking status is initially set to “Pending”.
PG owners can view booking requests associated with their properties through the dashboard. Owners can approve or reject requests, which updates booking status and available room count accordingly.

9.9 Review and Rating Module Implementation
The review module allows authenticated users to submit ratings and textual feedback for PG accommodations. Rating values are restricted to a defined range to maintain consistency.
Submitted reviews are associated with the respective PG identifier and stored in localStorage. The system calculates average ratings dynamically based on submitted reviews.
Reviews are displayed on PG detail pages in chronological order, enhancing transparency and trust.

9.10 Owner Dashboard Implementation
The owner dashboard serves as a centralized management interface for PG owners. It displays summary statistics such as total listings, pending bookings, approved bookings, and rejected bookings.
Tabbed navigation separates listing management and booking management functionalities. Owners can perform CRUD operations on listings and manage booking requests efficiently.
This dashboard significantly reduces administrative overhead for property owners.

9.11 User Profile Module Implementation
The user profile module allows students and professionals to view and manage their personal information. Editable profile forms enable users to update contact details.
The booking history section displays all booking requests submitted by the user along with their current status. Links allow users to navigate to PG details directly from booking records.
This module improves user engagement and system transparency.

9.12 Data Persistence Using Local Storage
All dynamic data is persisted using the browser localStorage API. Whenever state changes occur, updated data is serialized and saved to localStorage.
On application reload, stored data is retrieved and used to rehydrate the application state. This mechanism ensures continuity of user sessions and stored records.
While localStorage has limitations, it effectively supports the academic scope of the project.

9.13 Error Handling and Validation
Form-level validation ensures that required fields are filled and valid data is entered. Error messages provide clear feedback to users in case of invalid input.
Basic error handling mechanisms prevent application crashes due to undefined data or invalid state transitions.

9.14 Performance and Optimization Considerations
Reusable components and conditional rendering minimize unnecessary UI updates. Efficient state management reduces re-render cycles.
Optimized asset loading and lightweight architecture ensure fast application performance across devices.












10. TESTING
Testing is a critical phase in the software development lifecycle that ensures the application functions correctly, reliably, and as intended. The primary objective of testing the PG Accommodation Finder application is to identify defects, validate functional requirements, and ensure a smooth user experience across different usage scenarios.
Since the project follows a frontend-only architecture, testing primarily focuses on functional validation, user interface behavior, data consistency, and interaction workflows rather than server-side performance or security testing.

10.1 Objectives of Testing
The testing process aims to verify that each module of the application performs according to the specified requirements. It ensures that user actions result in correct system responses and that the application handles both valid and invalid inputs gracefully.
Testing also aims to validate navigation flow, state management consistency, data persistence using localStorage, and compatibility across devices and browsers. By identifying and fixing issues early, testing improves system reliability and user confidence.

10.2 Testing Strategy
A systematic testing strategy is adopted to ensure complete coverage of application functionality. The strategy includes manual testing of all modules and interaction flows, as the project is frontend-focused and UI-driven.
The testing approach follows a modular structure, where individual components are tested independently before validating integrated workflows such as booking and review submission. Special attention is given to edge cases, incorrect user inputs, and authorization-based access control.

10.3 Types of Testing Performed
10.3.1 Unit Testing
Unit testing focuses on validating individual components and functions in isolation. Each React component is tested to ensure it renders correctly and responds appropriately to user interactions.
Examples include testing form input components, PG card rendering, filter selection behavior, and button click handlers. Unit testing ensures that component-level logic is error-free before integration.

10.3.2 Integration Testing
Integration testing verifies the interaction between multiple components and modules. This type of testing ensures that data flows correctly across components through the Context API.
Key integration scenarios include navigation between pages, passing PG identifiers from listings to detail pages, and synchronizing booking status updates across user and owner dashboards. Successful integration testing confirms that modules work cohesively as a single system.

10.3.3 Functional Testing
Functional testing validates the application against its functional requirements. Each feature described in the project scope is tested using real-world user scenarios.
Examples include user registration, login authentication, PG search and filtering, booking request submission, booking approval or rejection, and review posting. Functional testing ensures that all system features operate correctly and deliver expected outputs.

10.3.4 User Interface Testing
User interface testing ensures that all UI elements display correctly and maintain consistency across different screen sizes and devices. Layout alignment, font readability, button responsiveness, and navigation clarity are evaluated.
Responsive design behavior is tested on desktops, tablets, and mobile devices to ensure usability remains consistent. UI testing also verifies accessibility aspects such as form labels, input validation messages, and visual feedback.

10.3.5 Data Persistence Testing
Since the application relies on browser localStorage for data persistence, testing focuses on validating correct data storage and retrieval.
Scenarios include verifying session persistence after page reloads, ensuring booking data is retained correctly, and confirming review data remains available across sessions. Data consistency testing ensures that stored data reflects the current application state accurately.

10.3.6 Security and Authorization Testing
Basic security testing is performed to validate role-based access control. Unauthorized users are restricted from accessing protected pages such as the owner dashboard and user profile.
Testing confirms that students cannot access owner functionalities and that guest users cannot submit booking requests or reviews. Although advanced security mechanisms are not implemented due to frontend-only scope, basic authorization logic is thoroughly validated.

10.4 Test Environment
Testing is conducted in a controlled development environment using modern web browsers. The application is tested on multiple browsers to ensure compatibility and consistent behavior.
Different device viewports are simulated using browser developer tools to test responsiveness. LocalStorage data is cleared and reset frequently to validate system behavior under fresh and repeated usage conditions.

10.5 Test Cases
10.5.1 Authentication Module Test Cases
User registration is tested with valid and invalid input data to ensure form validation works correctly. Login functionality is tested with correct and incorrect credentials to verify authentication logic.
Logout functionality is tested to ensure session data is cleared and access to protected routes is revoked.

10.5.2 PG Listing and Search Test Cases
PG listing display is tested to ensure all properties load correctly from static data and localStorage. Search functionality is tested using different keywords to validate matching behavior.
Filter options are tested individually and in combination to ensure accurate result refinement. Sorting options are tested to confirm correct ordering of listings.

10.5.3 Booking Module Test Cases
Booking request submission is tested with valid data to ensure successful storage and confirmation display. Attempting to book without authentication is tested to confirm redirection to the login page.
Booking status updates by owners are tested to ensure changes are reflected in both owner and user views. Available room count updates are validated after booking approval.

10.5.4 Review and Rating Test Cases
Review submission is tested to ensure only authenticated users can post reviews. Rating value constraints are validated to prevent invalid ratings.
Average rating calculation is tested to ensure accuracy after multiple reviews. Review display order and content consistency are verified.

10.5.5 Profile and Dashboard Test Cases
User profile updates are tested to ensure changes are stored and reflected correctly. Booking history display is validated for accuracy and completeness.
Owner dashboard functionalities such as listing creation, editing, deletion, and booking management are tested to ensure smooth operation.

10.6 Test Results and Observations
All major functional modules of the PG Accommodation Finder application were tested successfully. The application demonstrated stable behavior across different browsers and devices.
Minor UI alignment issues were identified during initial testing and corrected. Data persistence using localStorage was found to be reliable within the same browser environment. Role-based access control functioned as expected.
No critical functional defects were observed after final testing.

10.7 Limitations of Testing
Due to the frontend-only nature of the project, certain types of testing such as server load testing, database performance testing, and penetration testing were not applicable.
Additionally, localStorage-based persistence limits testing scenarios related to multi-user concurrency and cross-device synchronization.





Excellent. Below are BOTH remaining chapters — Chapter 11 (Results & Screenshots) and Chapter 12 (Conclusion & Future Enhancements) — written in the same academic style, bold side headings only, no divider lines, and sized correctly to close a 50+ page project report without looking padded or weak.
Paste them directly.

11. RESULTS AND SCREENSHOTS
This chapter presents the final outcomes of the PG Accommodation Finder project after successful implementation and testing. It highlights how the system fulfills its objectives and demonstrates the working of major modules through observed results and interface outputs. Screenshots are included to visually validate functionality and user interface design.

11.1 Overview of Results
The PG Accommodation Finder application was successfully implemented as a frontend-only web application using modern web technologies. The system operates smoothly across multiple devices and browsers, providing a consistent and responsive user experience.
All core functionalities such as user authentication, PG listing browsing, search and filtering, booking management, review submission, and owner dashboard operations were implemented and tested successfully. The application demonstrates reliable data persistence using browser localStorage and ensures role-based access control.

11.2 Home Page Output
The home page serves as the entry point of the application and provides a clear overview of the system’s purpose. It includes a navigation bar, hero section, feature highlights, and featured PG listings.
The layout is visually appealing and responsive, ensuring accessibility across desktop and mobile devices. Call-to-action buttons guide users to browse PG listings easily.
(Screenshot: Home Page UI)

11.3 User Authentication Screens
The authentication module includes separate registration and login pages for students/professionals and PG owners. Input validation ensures correct data entry and provides meaningful error messages for invalid inputs.
Successful login redirects users to role-specific pages, while unauthorized access attempts are blocked effectively.
(Screenshot: Login Page, Registration Page)

11.4 PG Listings and Search Results
The PG listings page displays all available accommodations in a structured card-based layout. Users can search by location or property name and apply multiple filters simultaneously.
Sorting options allow users to reorder listings based on price or rating. The results update dynamically without page reloads, demonstrating efficient client-side rendering.
(Screenshot: PG Listings Page with Filters)

11.5 PG Details Page Output
The PG details page provides comprehensive information about selected accommodations. It includes an image gallery, pricing details, amenities list, availability status, owner contact details, and user reviews.
The booking request button is prominently displayed, encouraging user interaction. Verified status indicators enhance trust and credibility.
(Screenshot: PG Details Page)

11.6 Booking Module Output
The booking module allows authenticated users to submit booking requests through a structured form. Upon submission, users receive a booking confirmation screen displaying request details.
Booking status tracking enables users to monitor approval or rejection outcomes. Owners can manage booking requests from the dashboard.
(Screenshot: Booking Form, Booking Confirmation Page)

11.7 Owner Dashboard Output
The owner dashboard provides a centralized management interface for PG owners. It displays statistical summaries such as total listings and booking statuses.
Owners can add, edit, and delete PG listings and manage booking requests efficiently. Changes made by owners are reflected immediately across the application.
(Screenshot: Owner Dashboard)

11.8 User Profile Page Output
The user profile page displays personal information and booking history. Users can update profile details and navigate to PG details directly from booking records.
This module enhances transparency and user engagement.
(Screenshot: User Profile Page)

11.9 Summary of Results
The results confirm that the PG Accommodation Finder application meets its functional and usability objectives. The system demonstrates stability, responsiveness, and clarity in user interactions, validating the design and implementation approach.

























12. CONCLUSION AND FUTURE ENHANCEMENTS
This chapter concludes the project by summarizing achievements and discussing potential future enhancements. It reflects on how the project objectives were achieved and identifies areas for further improvement.

12.1 Conclusion
The PG Accommodation Finder project successfully addresses the challenges associated with traditional PG accommodation search methods. By providing a centralized, user-friendly, and transparent platform, the system simplifies the process of discovering and managing PG accommodations for students and working professionals.
The frontend-only architecture demonstrates the effective use of modern web technologies such as React, Context API, and localStorage. The project highlights the importance of modular design, responsive interfaces, and client-side state management in building scalable web applications.
The system fulfills all defined objectives, including role-based access, booking management, review systems, and owner dashboards. Overall, the project serves as a strong academic demonstration of frontend application development and problem-solving skills.

12.2 Limitations of the System
Despite its success, the system has certain limitations due to its frontend-only nature. Data stored in localStorage is device-specific and lacks advanced security mechanisms.
The absence of backend services limits scalability, multi-user concurrency, and real-time communication. Payment processing and notification services are also not supported in the current implementation.
These limitations are acceptable within the academic scope of the project but highlight opportunities for future development.

12.3 Future Enhancements
Several enhancements can be incorporated to improve functionality and scalability in future versions of the system.
Backend integration using RESTful APIs and databases such as MySQL or MongoDB can enable centralized data storage and multi-user support. Secure authentication mechanisms such as JWT-based login can enhance system security.
Online payment gateway integration can streamline booking confirmation processes. Real-time chat functionality can improve communication between tenants and PG owners.
Map-based location visualization using GPS services can enhance location-based search. Advanced analytics dashboards can provide insights into booking trends and user behavior.
Multi-language support can improve accessibility for a wider audience.

12.4 Final Remarks
The PG Accommodation Finder project demonstrates a practical and effective solution to a real-world problem using modern frontend development practices. The system lays a strong foundation for future expansion into a full-scale web application.
The knowledge gained through this project enhances understanding of system design, implementation, testing, and documentation, making it a valuable learning experience and a strong addition to an academic portfolio.


